Illinois, session 104th, SB3938.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Property Tax Code is amended by adding 5Article 31.1 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 200/Art. 31.1 heading new)7Article 31.1. Site Value Tax Law 8    (35 ILCS 200/31.1-1 new)9    Sec. 31.1-1. Short title. This Article may be cited as the 10Site Value Tax Law. 11    (35 ILCS 200/31.1-5 new)12    Sec. 31.1-5. Site value tax authorized. In addition to any 13other tax authorized under this Code, each taxing district 14may, by ordinance, levy a site value tax upon the assessed 15value of land within the taxing district. Taxes under this 16Article shall be levied uniformly by valuation within the 17taxing district.18    As used in this Section, "assessed value" means 33 1/3% of 19the fair cash value of the land, without regard to buildings, 20structures, improvements, or other permanent fixtures on the 21land, except for the value of oil, gas, coal, and other   SB3938- 2 -LRB104 19880 HLH 33330 b1minerals in the land and the right to remove such oil, gas, 2coal, and other minerals from the land.  3    (35 ILCS 200/31.1-10 new)4    Sec. 31.1-10. Collection of site value tax; enforcement. 5The tax under this Article shall be collected in accordance 6with the procedures established for the collection of property 7taxes under Article 20 of this Code. For the purpose of 8collecting the tax under this Article, taxpayers shall be 9subject to the due dates and enforcement actions, and shall 10have the rights, remedies, and privileges, set forth in 11Articles 21, 22, and 23 of this Code with respect to the taxes 12under this Article. 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.